Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 6. Distributions.

§79-29-601.
Distributions generally and interim distributions.

For purposes of this article, except for Section 79-29-611(1) which shall apply to any member, any reference to a member of a limited liability company in this article shall mean a member who owns a financial interest and shall not mean a member who does not own a financial interest or hold a financial right in the limited liability company.

Except as provided in this article, to the extent specified in the certificate of formation or the operating agreement and at the times or upon the occurrence of the events specified in the certificate of formation or operating agreement, a member is entitled to receive from a limited liability company distributions before the member’s withdrawal from the limited liability company and before the dissolution and winding-up thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-601 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to interim distributions. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

Assignor of a limited liability company interest not released from liability to the company under this article, see § 79-29-704.

Assignor of a limited liability company interest not released from liability to the company under this article, see § 79-29-707.

Order of distribution of assets of limited liability company, see § 79-29-813.

§79-29-602.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-602. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-602 was entitled: Distribution upon dissociation. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-603.

§79-29-603.
Distribution upon withdrawal of member.

Except as provided in this article, upon withdrawal any withdrawing member is entitled to receive any distribution to which the member is entitled under an operating agreement and, if not otherwise provided in an operating agreement, the member is entitled to receive, within a reasonable time after withdrawal the fair value of the member’s financial interest as of the date of withdrawal based upon the member’s right to share in distributions from the limited liability company.

For purposes of this section the fair value of the member’s financial interest shall be determined as of the date of withdrawal:

Using customary and current valuation concepts and techniques generally employed for similar businesses in the context of the transaction requiring appraisal; and

Without discounting for lack of marketability or minority status.

The distribution must be accompanied by current financial statements of the limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-603 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to distribution in kind. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-605.

§79-29-604.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-604. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 40, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-604 was entitled: Right to distribution. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-607.

§79-29-605.
Distribution in kind.

A member, regardless of the nature of the person’s contribution, has no right to demand and receive any distribution from a limited liability company in any form other than cash.A member may not be compelled to accept a distribution of any asset in kind from a limited liability company to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to the person exceeds a percentage of that asset which is equal to the percentage in which the person shares in distributions from the limited liability company.Except as provided in the operating agreement, a member may be compelled to accept a distribution of any asset in kind from a limited liability company to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed is equal to a percentage of that asset which is equal to the percentage in which the member shares in distributions from the limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-605 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to limitations on distribution. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-609.

§79-29-606.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-606. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-606 was entitled: Liability for wrongful distribution. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-611.

§79-29-607.
Right to distribution.

Subject to Sections 79-29-609 and 79-29-813, at the time a member becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the member has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited liability company with respect to the distribution.An operating agreement may provide for the establishment of a record date with respect to allocations and distributions by a limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-609.
Limitations on distribution.

No distribution may be made if, after giving effect to the distribution:

The limited liability company would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of business; or

The limited liability company’s total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus the amount that would be needed, if the limited liability company were to be dissolved at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights of other members upon dissolution which are superior to the rights of the member receiving the distribution.

For purposes of this section, the term “distribution” shall not include amounts constituting reasonable compensation for present or past services or reasonable payments made in the ordinary course of business pursuant to a bona fide retirement plan or other benefits program.

The limited liability company may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (1) of this section either on:

Financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable under the circumstances; or

A fair valuation or other method that is reasonable under the circumstances.

The effect of a distribution under subsection (1) of this section is measured as of:(a) the date the distribution is authorized if the payment occurs within one hundred twenty (120) days after the date of authorization; or (b) the date payment is made if it occurs more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date of authorization.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

Applicability of this section to distributions to which § 79-29-813 applies, see § 79-29-813.

§79-29-611.
Liability for wrongful distribution.

A member or manager who votes for or assents to a distribution in violation of the certificate of formation or operating agreement or Section 79-29-609 is personally liable to the limited liability company for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating Section 79-29-609 or the certificate of formation or operating agreement if it is established that the member or manager did not act in compliance with Section 79-29-609. Each member or manager held liable under this subsection (1) is entitled to contribution:

From each other member or manager who could be held liable under this subsection (1) for the unlawful distribution; and

From each member for the amount the member received knowing that the distribution was made in violation of Section 79-29-605, the certificate of formation or the operating agreement.

A member who receives a distribution in violation of Section 79-29-609, and who knew at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated Section 79-29-609, shall be liable to a limited liability company for the amount of the distribution.

A member who receives a distribution in violation of Section 79-29-609, and who did not know at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated Section 79-29-609, shall not be liable for the amount of the distribution.

Subject to subsection (4) of this section, this section shall not affect any obligation or liability of a member under an agreement or other applicable law for the amount of a distribution.

Unless otherwise agreed, a member who either assents to or receives a distribution from a limited liability company shall have no liability under this chapter or other applicable law for the amount of the distribution after the expiration of two (2) years from the date of the distribution unless an action to recover the distribution from the member is commenced before the expiration of the two-year period and an adjudication of liability against the member is made in the action.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.